Illinois, session 104th, SB3181.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 368k as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/368k new)7    Sec. 368k. Fair physician payment; minimum reimbursement; 8penalties.9    (a) In this Section:10    "County" means one or all of the following 4 counties: 11Cook, DuPage, Lake, and Will Counties in Illinois.12    "Covered health care service" means any service for which 13a Medicare rate has been established at the time the physician 14service is provided.15    "Health insurance company" means any insurance company, 16health maintenance organization, preferred provider 17organization, or other entity that administers a health 18insurance plan subject to regulation under the laws of 19Illinois.20    "Health insurance plan" does not include a noncommercial 21insurance plan, such as a personal line or a policy of excepted 22benefits.23    "Medicare rate" means the applicable Current Procedural   SB3181- 2 -LRB104 18630 BAB 32073 b1Terminology (CPT) Code established under the Medicare 2Physician Fee Schedule in effect on the date the physician 3services are rendered.4    "Physician" means an individual licensed to practice 5medicine or osteopathy under applicable State law and any 6advanced practice provider practicing under the supervision of 7a physician.8    (b) A health insurance company shall reimburse a physician 9providing covered health care services in any county for no 10less than 160% of the Medicare rate then in effect for the same 11service.12    (c) If Medicare established multiple payment rates for a 13service, the reimbursement floor shall be calculated using the 14rate that most closely corresponds to the setting and type of 15service.16    (d) Any contract, policy, or agreement that provides for 17reimbursement at a rate lower than the minimum reimbursement 18in subsections (b) and (c) shall be void and unenforceable to 19the extent of the conflict.20    (e) A physician shall not waive the protections of this 21Section as a condition of participation in a health benefit 22plan or for any other reason.23    (f) The Department shall enforce this Section and may 24adopt rules necessary to implement its provisions.25    (g) A health insurance company that violates this Section 26shall be subject to:  SB3181- 3 -LRB104 18630 BAB 32073 b1        (1) civil penalties of up to $15,000 per individual 2    violation;3        (2) payment of restitution to the affected physician; 4    and5        (3) any additional remedies authorized by the 6    Department.